Washington statutes.
RCW 31.40.020

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Licensee" means a Washington corporation licensed under the terms of this chapter.

(2) "Director" means the director of financial institutions.

[ 1994 c 92 s 262; 1989 c 212 s 2.]